Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 2

Community Clinics

71-5-201. Reimbursement for services — Authorization.

Any community or neighborhood health organization or clinic providing medical services to patients through the utilization of medical students presently enrolled in a medical school accredited by the Association of American Medical Colleges, licensed registered nurses, qualified physician assistants, or any combination of students, registered nurses, and physician assistants where such students, registered nurses, and physician assistants, are under the direction of a licensed physician or physicians, may receive payment for their per patient expenses, or portion of the expenses, which may include, but are not limited to, administrative expenses, overhead expenses, and salaries.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to authorize or permit direct payment, by the state, of medicaid to any physician assistant.

Acts 1973, ch. 262, § 2; 1975, ch. 58, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-1929; Acts 1981, ch. 476, § 5; 1983, ch. 168, § 11; 1984, ch. 787, § 11; T.C.A., §14-23-201.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-202. Restrictions on services.

Medical services that are presently provided in specialized public health facilities as in tuberculosis hospitals, mental institutions, and institutions providing highly specialized inpatient care shall not be undertaken by the organizations and clinics covered by this part, and such services will be rendered under present statutes on a referral basis from such organizations and clinics.

Acts 1973, ch. 262, § 2; 1975, ch. 58, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 14-1931, 14-23-203, 71-5-203.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-5-203 was transferred to §71-5-202 by the code commission in 2012.